Tennessee, session 114, HB2010.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 12, Chapter 3, Part 5, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "One hundred percent (100%) French process zinc oxide" means zinc
oxide produced exclusively by the French or indirect process that is not blended
or combined with zinc oxide produced by any other process, including the
American or direct process, or any other materials;
(2) "Price list or buying guide" means a document, electronic or
otherwise, provided to this state for procurement purposes that lists tires
available for purchase, including, but not limited to, pricing, specifications, and
product designations;
(3) "Solicitation" means a solicitation, request for proposal, or invitation to
bid issued by this state or on behalf of this state for the procurement of goods or
services; and
(4) "Tire manufacturer or supplier" means a person, firm, corporation, or
other entity that manufacturers, produces, supplies, or offers to supply tires to
this state, whether directly or through a distributor or agent.
(b) A tire manufacturer or supplier submitting a response to a solicitation for the
supply of tires issued by this state shall clearly identify and designate which tires offered
HB2010
011217
- 1 -

have been produced or manufactured with one hundred percent (100%) French process
zinc oxide at the time of the submission. Such designation must be indicated by tire
product and material number, be made in a manner prescribed by the chief procurement
officer, and be included in all documentation submitted as a part of the procurement
process.
(c) A price list or buying guide provided to this state by a tire manufacturer or
supplier for procurement purposes must clearly indicate for each tire listed whether the
tire has been produced or manufactured with one hundred percent (100%) French
process zinc oxide. Such designation required by this subsection (c) must be
conspicuous and in a format approved by the chief procurement officer.
(d) A tire manufacturer or supplier with an existing contract to supply tires to this
state on the effective date of this act shall amend, within one hundred twenty (120) days
of such date, each price list or buying guide used in connection with such contract to
comply with the disclosure requirements set forth in this section. Failure to comply with
this subsection (d) may result in the suspension or termination of the contract at the
discretion of the chief procurement officer.
(e) If, during the term of a contract with this state, a tire manufacturer or supplier
makes a change in the manufacturing process of any tire supplied under the contract
that affects whether the tire is manufactured with one hundred percent (100%) French
process zinc oxide, the manufacturer or supplier shall amend, within ninety (90) days of
such change, each relevant price list or buying guide to reflect such change. The
manufacturer or supplier shall provide written notice of such change to the chief
procurement officer, to each relevant state agency utilizing the contract, and to each
intermediary agency or entity that may be facilitating solicitations on behalf of this state.
- 2 - 011217

(f) The chief procurement officer may promulgate rules as necessary to
implement and enforce this section in accordance with the Uniform Administrative
Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.
(h) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "state"
includes an intermediary agency or entity facilitating solicitations on behalf of this state.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 011217